dictionaries/el-polyton/index.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX w Y 17	
SFX w ῶν ῶντος ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶντι ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶντα ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶντες ῶν
SFX w ῶν ώντων ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶσι ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶσιν ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶντας ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶσα ῶν
SFX w ῶν ώσης ῶν
SFX w ῶν ώσῃ ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶσαν ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶσαι ῶν
SFX w ῶν ουσῶν ῶν
SFX w ῶν ώσαις ῶν
SFX w ῶν ώσας ῶν
SFX w ῶν ῶν ῶν

SFX Σ Y 18	 
SFX Σ ών όντος ών
SFX Σ ών όντι ών
SFX Σ ών όντα ών
SFX Σ ών όντες ών
SFX Σ ών όντων ών
SFX Σ ών οῦσι ών
SFX Σ ών οῦσιν ών
SFX Σ ών όντας ών
SFX Σ ών οῦσα ών
SFX Σ ών ούσης ών
SFX Σ ών ούσῃ ών
SFX Σ ών οῦσαν ών
SFX Σ ών οῦσαι ών
SFX Σ ών ουσών ών
SFX Σ ών ούσαις ών
SFX Σ ών ούσας ών
SFX Σ ών όν ών
SFX Σ ών ὸν ών

SFX T Y 17	
SFX T ύς ύντος ύς
SFX T ύς ύντι ύς
SFX T ύς ύντα ύς
SFX T ύς ύντες ύς
SFX T ύς ύντων ύς
SFX T ύς ῦσι ύς
SFX T ύς ῦσιν ύς
SFX T ύς ύντας ύς
SFX T ύς ῦσα ύς
SFX T ύς ύσης ύς
SFX T ύς ύσῃ ύς
SFX T ύς ῦσαν ύς
SFX T ύς ῦσαι ύς
SFX T ύς υσῶν ύς
SFX T ύς ύσαις ύς
SFX T ύς ύσας ύς
SFX T ύς ύν ύς
